Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 54 Rhode Island Dealership Preservation and Protection Act

6-54-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Rhode Island Dealership Preservation and Protection Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 370, § 1.

6-54-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Community of interest” means a continuing financial interest between the grantor and the grantee in either the operation of the dealership business or the marketing of such goods or services.

“Continuing financial interest” means the following:

A dealership relationship of at least one year in duration between the grantor and dealer, without regard to:

Any minimum percentage of revenue or profit derived therefrom by the dealer;

Any minimum financial investment by the dealer; or

The aggregate economic size or level of activity by the dealer or its affiliates; and

The dealer has expended, allocated, or dedicated revenue or personnel to promoting the sale or distribution of the grantor’s goods or services, including investments in grantor inventory, sales and marketing, or facilities; and

Dealer and grantor cooperate, coordinate activities, or share common goals.

“Dealer” means a person who is a grantee of a dealership situated in this state, and any successor in interest, regardless of the subsequent sale or change in ownership of such entity.

“Dealership” means any of the following: A contract or agreement, either expressed or implied, whether oral or written, between two (2) or more persons, by which a person is granted the right to sell or distribute goods or services, or use a trade name, trademark, service mark, logotype, advertising, or other commercial symbol, in which there is a community of interest in the business of offering, selling, or distributing goods or services at wholesale, retail, by lease, agreement, or otherwise.

“Good cause” means, for the purposes of this act, good cause for terminating, diminishing, canceling, or nonrenewal shall mean:

The failure by the dealer to substantially comply with the reasonable requirements imposed by the grantor; or

Any of the reasons listed in §

6-54-4(a)(1)

through (a)(6). A sale or change in ownership shall not constitute good cause.

“Grantor” means a person who grants a dealership, and any successor in interest, regardless of the subsequent sale or change in ownership of such person.

“Person” means a natural person, partnership, joint venture, corporation, or other entity.

“Sale or change in ownership” means with respect to any grantor or dealer, the direct or indirect sale of such person’s assets or equity ownership, whether by merger or sale or other change in control event. A sale or change in ownership shall be considered for purposes of this chapter as a continuation of the prior dealership relationship and shall not be deemed to have interrupted, ended, or restarted such relationship between the parties.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 243, § 1, effective June 28, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 244, § 1, effective June 28, 2022.

6-54-3.
Purposes; rules of construction; variation by contract.

This chapter shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying remedial purposes and policies.

The underlying purposes and policies of this chapter are:

To promote the compelling interest of the public in fair business relations between dealers and grantors, and in the continuation of dealerships on a fair basis;

To protect dealers against unfair treatment by grantors;

To provide dealers with rights and remedies in addition to those existing by contract or common law;

To govern dealerships, including any renewals or amendments, to the full extent consistent with the constitutions of this state and the United States.

The effect of this chapter may not be varied by contract or agreement. Any contract or agreement purporting to do so is void and unenforceable to that extent only.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 370, § 1.

6-54-4.
Notice of termination or change in dealership.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any agreement to the contrary, a grantor shall provide a dealer sixty (60) days prior written notice of termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal. The notice shall state all reasons for termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal and shall provide that the dealer has thirty (30) days in which to cure any claimed deficiency; provided, that a dealer has a right to cure three (3) times in any twelve-month (12) period during the period of the dealership agreement. The sixty-day (60) notice provisions of this section shall not apply and the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal may be made effective immediately upon written notice, if the reason for termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal is in the event the dealer:

Voluntarily abandons the dealership relationship;

Is convicted of a felony offense related to the business conducted pursuant to the dealership;

Engages in any substantial act that tends to materially impair the goodwill of the grantor’s trade name, trademark, service mark, logotype, or other commercial symbol;

Makes a material misrepresentation of fact to the grantor relating to the dealership;

Attempts to transfer the dealership (or a portion thereof) without authorization of the grantor, excluding a sale or change of ownership; or

Is insolvent, files or suffers to be filed against it any voluntary or involuntary bankruptcy petition, or makes an assignment for the benefit of creditors or similar disposition of assets of the dealer business.

If the reason for termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal is nonpayment of sums due under the dealership, the dealer shall be entitled to written notice of such default, and shall have ten (10) days in which to cure such default from the date of such notice. A dealer has the right to cure three (3) times in any twelve-month (12) period during the period of the dealership agreement.

If the reason for termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal is for violation of any law, regulation, or standard relating to public health or safety, the dealer shall be entitled to immediate written notice and shall have five (5) days to cure such violation from the date of receipt of the written notice.

No grantor may terminate, cancel, or fail to renew a dealership, directly or indirectly, or otherwise take any action to diminish the dealership or its value, other than for good cause. No grantor may terminate, cancel, or fail to renew a dealership, directly or indirectly, or otherwise take any action to diminish the dealership or its value, if the dealership shall cure the alleged deficiency or violation in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 243, § 1, effective June 28, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 244, § 1, effective June 28, 2022.

6-54-5.
Repurchase of inventories.

If a dealership is terminated by the grantor, the grantor, at the option of the dealer, shall repurchase all inventories sold by the grantor to the dealer for resale under the dealership agreement at the fair market value. This section applies only to merchandise with a name, trademark, label or other mark on it which identifies the grantor.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 370, § 1.

6-54-6.
Application to arbitration agreements.

This chapter shall not apply to provisions for the binding arbitration of disputes contained in a dealership agreement, if the criteria for determining whether good cause existed for a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal, and the relief provided is no less than that provided for in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 370, § 1.

6-54-7.
Action for damages and injunctive relief.

If any grantor violates this chapter, a dealer may bring an action against such grantor in any court of competent jurisdiction for damages sustained by the dealer as a consequence of the grantor’s violation, together with the actual costs of the action, including reasonable actual attorneys’ fees, and the dealer also may be granted injunctive relief against unlawful termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal. For purposes of this chapter, damages shall include, without limitation, reasonable compensation for the fair market value of the dealer’s business with relation to the dealership.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 370, § 1.

6-54-8.
Temporary injunctions.

In any action brought by a dealer against a grantor under this chapter, any violation of this chapter by the grantor is deemed an irreparable injury to the dealer in determining if temporary injunctions should issue.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 370, § 1.

6-54-9.
Nonapplicability.

This chapter shall not apply to malt beverage dealerships; motor vehicle dealerships; insurance agency relationships; any relationship relating to the sale or administration of insurance or any similar contract with an entity organized under chapter 19 or 20 of title 27; fuel distribution dealerships; door-to-door sales; dealers and single-line dealers as defined in §

6-46-2

; dealerships, and franchises, franchisors, franchisees, dealers and dealerships that are subject to, and comply with or are exempt from, the provisions of chapter 28.1 of title 19, known as the “Rhode Island Franchise Investment Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 41; P.L. 2022, ch. 243, § 1, effective June 28, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 244, § 1, effective June 28, 2022.

6-54-10.
Exclusive jurisdiction.

Notwithstanding any agreements between grantor and dealer to the contrary, the courts in Rhode Island shall have the exclusive jurisdiction over any disputes arising out of or relating to this chapter including, but not limited to, any claim for which a dealer relies on this chapter as a defense to any purported termination, cancellation, or failure to renew.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 243, § 2, effective June 28, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 244, § 2, effective June 28, 2022.